Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1533
Aiding and abetting nonresident of county; penalty.

Any person who procures, aids, assists, counsels, or advises another to go or come into any county for the purpose of giving his or her vote in such county knowing that the other person is not duly qualified to vote in such county shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 432.